Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,200
Collection remedy; cumulative.

The collection remedy authorized by sections 77-27,197 to 77-27,209 shall be in addition to and not in substitution for any other remedy available by law.

Laws 1993, LB 46, § 4.